Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 80 Rhode Island School-To-Career Transition Act of 1996

16-80-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island School-to-Career Transition Act of 1996.” When in the general or public laws there appear the words, “The Rhode Island School-to-Work Transition Act of 1996,” it shall now read, “The Rhode Island School-to-Career Transition Act of 1996.” When in the general or public laws there appear the words, “School-to-Work,” it shall now read, “School-to-Career.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 319, § 1.

16-80-2.
Findings.

The general assembly has found and declares that:

Three-fourths (3/4) of adults in the Rhode Island workforce lack a baccalaureate degree, and many do not possess the academic and entry-level occupational skills necessary to succeed in the changing workplace;

Twenty-eight percent (28%) of youths, ages sixteen (16) to twenty-four (24) in Rhode Island, especially disadvantaged students, students of diverse racial, ethnic and cultural backgrounds, and students with disabilities, do not complete high school;

Unemployment among youths, ages sixteen (16) to nineteen (19) in Rhode Island averaged eighteen and six-tenths percent (18.6%) in 1994, an intolerably high percentage, and earnings of high school graduates have been declining in relationship to earnings of individuals with post-secondary degrees;

The workplace in the United States and especially in Rhode Island is changing in response to heightened international competition and new technologies, and these forces, which are ultimately beneficial to the nation, are shrinking the demand for and undermining the earning power of unskilled labor;

Rhode Island lacks a comprehensive and coherent system to help its youth acquire the knowledge, skills, abilities, and information about and access to the labor market necessary to make an effective transition from school to career-oriented work or to further education and training;

Students in Rhode Island can achieve higher academic and occupational standards, and many learn better and retain more when the students learn in context rather than in the abstract;

While many students in Rhode Island have part-time jobs, there is infrequent linkage between:

These jobs, and

The career planning or exploration or the school-based learning of students;

The work-based learning approach, which is modeled after the time-honored apprenticeship concept, integrates theoretical instruction with structured on-the-job training, and this approach, combined with school-based learning, can be very effective in engaging student interest, enhancing skill acquisition, developing positive work attitudes, and preparing youths for high skill, high wage careers;

Federal resources currently fund a series of categorical, work-related education and training programs, many of which serve disadvantaged youths, that are not administered as a coherent whole; and

In 1990, approximately sixteen thousand seven hundred forty-one (16,741) individuals in Rhode Island, ages sixteen (16) through twenty-four (24), had not completed high school and were not currently enrolled in school, a population representing approximately twenty-eight percent (28%) of all individuals in this age group which indicates that these young persons are particularly unprepared for the demands of the twenty-first century.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.

16-80-3.
Purpose and intent.

The purpose and legislative intent of this chapter is:

To establish a state framework within which state departments can create an interagency mechanism to develop, implement and maintain a statewide system of school-to work transition;

To establish a state framework to promote the formation of local partnerships that link the worlds of school and work among schools and post-secondary educational institutions, private and public employers, labor organizations, government, community based organizations, parents, students, state educational, training, human service and economic development agencies and that will provide all students with opportunities to participate in education and training programs that will prepare them for high skill, high wage careers, further education and training and lifelong learning.

To establish a system that ensures that females, minority students, limited-English proficient students and students with disabilities are provided with equitable opportunities to both participate in and benefit from apprenticeships and careers in skilled trades and advanced technology by providing them with necessary modifications and support to succeed;

To utilize federal funds to develop, implement, and maintain a statewide school-to-work system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.

16-80-4.
Interagency partnerships.

A mechanism will be developed as part of the statewide school-to-career system that brings the departments of elementary and secondary education, labor and training, human services and the Rhode Island economic development corporation together to collaboratively support, implement, and maintain the statewide school-to-career system and to provide resources, technical assistance and support to regional and local partnerships. Regional and local partnerships must include employers, local school district representatives, teachers and their unions, post-secondary institutions, labor unions, and students. The roles and responsibilities of the partners will include the following:

The economic development corporation and the department of labor and training will:

Work in collaboration to define regions and major industry clusters in each region; and

Identify skills needed for growing and emerging businesses and industries.

The department of labor and training, the human resource investment council, and department of elementary and secondary education will:

Work in collaboration to develop employer incentives and guidelines for school-to-career local partnerships;

Develop a statewide information and delivery system to encourage and facilitate business, labor and education partnerships;

Develop testing and assessments to measure student knowledge and skills; and

Provide a state plan for professional development for various constituencies in the regional and local partnerships, and conduct an aggressive and ongoing outreach and marketing campaign.

The human resource investment council’s school-to-career subcommittee shall serve as the governing board for the school-to-career system and management team. This subcommittee shall consist of twenty (20) members comprised of: a chairperson who shall be appointed by the governor and be a member of the human resource investment council; the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or his or her designee; the director of the department of labor and training or his or her designee; the chairperson of the human resource investment council or his or her designee; the president of the Community College of Rhode Island or his or her designee; one superintendent of schools and one school principal to be appointed by the governor; two (2) representatives of labor unions appointed by the president of the Rhode Island AFL-CIO; four (4) members representing Rhode Island employers to be appointed by the governor; the president of the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers or his or her designee; and the president of the National Education Association of Rhode Island or his or her designee and five (5) additional members appointed by the governor based on recommendations from the school-to-career subcommittee to afford the subcommittee the opportunity to recommend potential members from stakeholder groups that are underrepresented on that subcommittee.

The private industry councils, regional employment and training boards, and collaboratives will:

Serve as the connectors between schools and the business community;

Provide technical assistance to employers and educators;

Provide training for workplace and school-site mentors; and

Collect data on post-program outcomes.

The interagency transition council, created by §

16-24-18

, will serve as the liaison on behalf of individuals with disabilities consistent with the mandate of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 319, § 1.

16-80-5.
Local partnerships.

Local partnerships will be developed to provide a framework within which local districts or consortia can develop school-to-work strategies which will:

Be integrated with education reform and school improvement efforts;

Offer opportunities for all students to participate in education and training programs that will prepare students for high skill, high wage careers and result in certification of knowledge and skills through a process such as a certificate of initial mastery and a certificate of advanced mastery recognized by both the education and business communities;

Increase opportunities for continuing education, two (2) year or four (4) year colleges and other technical education experiences;

Engage families in multiple roles to support and enhance opportunities for children to transition from school to work and to develop in-depth partnerships with businesses, colleges, families and community organizations to offer technical and substantive student workplace experiences for schools;

Be part of the state’s comprehensive education reform;

Be integrated with the state’s school-to-work plan;

Be integrated with the state’s workforce development plan and economic reform initiative;

Offer opportunities for all students to participate in performance-based education and training programs that will:

Enable students to earn portable credentials;

Prepare the students for first jobs in high skill, high wage careers; and

Increase their opportunities for further education, including education in a four (4) year college or university.

Utilize workplace as active learning environments in the educational process by making employers and labor organizations joint partners with educators in providing opportunities for all students to participate in high quality, work-based learning experiences;

Build on and advance existing promising practices;

Be integrated with the local partnerships established through the local educational collaboratives and their transition centers.

In developing the school-to-work system, the emphasis shall be on a structure that is flexible to meet local school needs and is available to students as needed and appropriate. Students and parents shall be involved in the students’ choices of career paths. The human resource investment council’s school-to-work subcommittee, for the purpose of successfully establishing and implementing the school-to-work system, shall endeavor to obtain the cooperation of employers, employees, unions, the commission on higher education, post-secondary institutions and school districts.

Programs and opportunities developed under this chapter shall not impair existing collective bargaining relationships, displace current employees, prevent rehiring laid-off employees, or impair promotion or job training opportunities for current employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.

16-80-6.
Outreach and professional development.

Through the interagency partnerships, the state school-to-work system shall provide a plan for ongoing outreach activities to inform and organize the school-to-work partnerships on regional and local levels. In establishing a school-to-work system, the state shall:

Redefine what constitutes professional development and develop and implement a plan for professional development and training opportunities for all stakeholders to include pre-service and in-service opportunities for educators and training opportunities for the business community and parents;

Provide professional development in applied techniques and integration of curriculum;

Provide career guidance for teachers and guidance counselors; and

Provide training for worksite mentors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.

16-80-7.
Report of findings.

The human resource investment council shall annually report to the legislature on the school-to-work transition program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.

16-80-8.
Appropriation of funds.

There shall be no appropriation of any state monies to carry out the purpose of this chapter without the approval of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 251, § 1.